fop/hyph/de.xml
        yt2h
        yt4he
        ythi3e
        y3to
        yto3s2
        y1u
        yu2r
        yure3
        yvet2
        yvon4
        ywurs4
        y1x
        y1y
        yze5r4i
        1z
        2z1aa
        2z1ab
        2zacc
        2z3ach
        za3cha
        za3chä
        2z1a2d
        za2e
        z3ae2c
        z2aeh
        2z3aem
        4z3aend
        4z5aengs
        z3aerm
        za3ess
        2z3aet
        4z3aeus
        4z3aeuß
        za3f4a
        2z3aff
        za3fl
        za2ga
        za3gr
        3z2ah
        zah4n5er4
        za3hol
        z2ai
        za3im
        z1ak
        2z3akk
        za3kl
        2z3alb
        2z3ald
        zal4e
        2z3all
        2z3alp
        2z3alt
        2z1am
        2z3a2na3
        2zanb
        zan3d2
        2zanf
        4z3anga
        4z5angeb
        z5angel
        z3angl
        4z3angs
        2zanh
        zan4ka
        zan4kl
        2zanl
        2z3anm
        2zano2
        2zanp
        2zanr
        2z3ans2
        z4ans.
        zanti3
        2zanw
        zao2
        zapf3l
        2z3a2po
        zap4ple
        2z1a2q
        3zar.
        2z3arb
        2zarc
        zare3s
        2z3arg
        2z3arm
        4z3arti
        zar4t3r
        zarts4
        2z3arz
        z1as
        zas2b
        zas2p
        z1at
        3z4aub
        2z3au2f3
        2z3aug
        2z3auk
        3zaun
        z3aur
        z3ausb
        z3ausf
        4z3ausg
        4z3ausl
        4z3auss
        4z3ausw
        2z3auß
        2z3aut
        2z1ä2c
        zäh4lei
        zäh4lin
        4zähnl
        zäh3r
        2z1äm
        2z3änd
        z3ängs
        z1äp
        z3ärg
        2z3ärm
        2z1ät
        2zäug
        2z3äus
        2zäuß
        2zäx
        2zb2
        z3be
        zber4e
        z3bo
        zbue3b
        zbü3b
        zby2
        2z1c
        2zd2
        zdan2
        zdä1
        zdi2e
        zdi5str
        z3ds
        zdue3b
        zdü3b
        4z3e4ben
        zebra3
        4z3echo
        zech3s
        zed2
        ze4dit
        ze1e2
        2z3eff
        zef2l
        zeg2
        ze4gal
        ze4hem
        zehe4n3
        zeh2l
        zehn3a
        zeh4n5en
        zehns4
        zei5cho
        zei3f2
        zeik2
        zei5le4
        zeilen5
        2z3ein
        ze3in.
        z4ein4a
        zein4de
        zei4n3e
        zeinen4
        z4eino
        ze5in4se
        zeis2
        zei3sk
        zei3sp
        zei3st
        zei4t3a
        zei4tä
        zeite4
        zei4teb
        zei4tei
        zei4tel
        zei4t5er5
        zei4t3o
        zei4tr
        zeit5re
        zeit5ri
        zeit6sto
        ze2la
        zel5abr
        zel3a4d
        zel3ae
        zel3am
        zela4n
        zel5an5e
        zel5ang
        zel3au
        ze2l3ä
        zel3d4
        ze4led
        zelei6er
        ze4l5eig
        ze5leis
        z3e4lek
        4zelekt
        4zeleme
        ze4l3en
        ze4l3er
        zeler5e
        ze4les
        zel3ex
        zel3id
        zel3in
        ze4linf
        4z3e4lit
        zel4lab
        zel4l5ac
        zellar6t
        zel6lein
        zeller6z
        zell3s4
        ze2lo
        zel3ob
        zelp2
        zels4t
        zel5ste
        zel3sz
        zel4tau
        zel4t5in
        zelu2
        zel5unk
        ze4lus
        zembe4
        zem4e
        ze4mis
        2z3emp
        zen4ade
        zena4g
        ze5natt
        zen3au
        ze2nä
        zende4c
        zende4k
        zende4s
        ze3nec
        zen5en5e
        zen5erke
        zen5ern
        zen5ertr
        ze4nerw
        zen3f2
        4z5en4ge.
        zenge6ne
        zengene6r
        4zengp
        zeng4r
        ze4nid
        zen5inn
        zenk2
        zen3n
        ze2n3o
        zen4san
        zensch4
        zen4sem
        zen4ser
        zens4po
        4z5entna
        zent5rae
        zent3s
        zen4z5ar
        zen6z5ers
        zen6zert
        zen6zerw
        zen4zin
        zen4zy
        zeo2r
        ze4pen
        ze3p2f
        zeppe3
        zer3ad
        zer3ae
        zer3a4g
        zer3an
        ze4r3at
        ze2r3ä
        6z5ereign
        ze4rein
        ze4remi
        zer5end
        zer5erw
        ze4r3e4t
        4z5erfol
        4z5erfül
        4z5ergae
        4z3ergä
        zer4gon
        4z3er4gu
        ze4r3i4d
        zerin6di
        zerin4f
        zerin4h
        zerin6te
        5zerl.
        zer6lang
        zer6laub
        zer4läu
        4z5erleb
        zer4lei
        zerlo4
        zer6maec
        4z5er4mäc
        5zerme
        zer4nan
        zer4n5e4b
        zer6nerb
        zer5obe
        ze3ros
        ze4rou
        ze3rös
        2z3erq
        zers2
        z5ersae
        4z5ersat
        zersau4
        4z3ersä
        zer3sk
        6z5er6strec
        zer4t5a4g
        zer4tar
        zerte4
        zer6t5emp
        zerten4
        zerter5
        zer6t5ere
        zer6terl
        zer4t5in
        zer4ton
        zer6t5rau
        zert3s4
        6z5erwerb
        zer4zä
        z4es.
        zes2a
        zes3au
        ze3sch
        zes3er
        zes4ph
        zes4sa4
        zess5ag
        zess5an
        zes4seb
        zessen4
        zes6s5end
        zes4ser4
        zess5erf
        zess5erz
        zes6s5ort.
        zes6s5or6te.
        zes6s5or6ten
        zes6s5orts
        zes4spa
        zes4spo
        zes4sum
        zes4s5ur4
        ze5stau
        zes4tie
        ze5stra
        4z3e4tap
        4zetat
        2z3e2th
        4zetts
        zeug3a
        zeu4gei
        zeu4gel
        zeu4g5e4m
        zeuge4n
        zeu6g5ersc
        zeu4g3r
        2z3eul
        ze3um
        ze3ur
        2z1e2x1
        2z1f2
        zfen2
        2zg2
        zge3n4a
        zger4a
        zge6r5in6nu
        zger4s5e
        2z1h2
        zhau4t3
        zi3af
        zi5alei
        zi5aleng
        zi5alim
        zi3ang
        zi2ar
        zib2
        zi3cho
        zich6t5er6
        zi4d3ak
        zi4d3ei
        3zie
        zie4hei
        zie4l3a
        ziele4
        zie4l5eb
        zie4lei
        zie4l5er
        zie4let
        zie4l3i
        zi3ell
        zie2n
        zierde4
        zie4r5ei
        zi3es.
        zi3ess
        zi3est
        zi3esu
        zi3esz
        zif4fr
        zi3fl
        zi4gec
        4z3i4gel
        zig3sp
        zi4kon
        zil4e
        zi4mit
        2z3imp
        zim2t3
        4z3inde
        zi4n5er4z
        zi4n3et
        zi4n3in
        4z3i4n3it
        zin4kae
        zin6k5erz
        zin4k3l
        zinks4
        zin4na
        zin4sa
        zin5sas
        4z5insel
        zin4ser
        4zinsuf
        zi2o
        zio3d
        zi3on.
        zi3ons
        zip4a
        zirk2
        zirks3
        4zirri
        zi3s2z
        3zit
        zi4t3an
        zite2
        zithe4
        zi2t3o2
        2zj
        2z1k2
        z3ko
        zko3ef
        z3kr
        zkue3b
        zkü3b
        z3ky
        2z1l
        zlan6d5er
        zlei5ti
        zle3s
        z3lo
        2z1m2
        zmau4s
        2z1n2
        zna5che
        z3ne
        znebe4
        znei3
        2z3o4as
        2z1ob
        2z3oe2d
        zoe2f
        3z4oeg
        2z3oek
        4zoel.
        4z3oels
        z1of
        zo2gl
        2z1oh
        zo4lig
        zol4l3a4
        zol4l5ei
        zol6l5en6t5
        zoller4
        zol6lerf
        zol6l5erk
        zol6l5erl
        zol6lert
        zol4lin
        zol4lo
        zolls4
        zoll5ste
        z3o2ly
        3zon
        zon3s2
        zon4teb
        zon4t5er
        3zo2o
        zoo3s
        2z3o2pe
        zop4f5en
        2zopt
        2z3ora
        z3orc
        z3ord
        z3org
        zo2ri
        zor4n3a
        zor4ner
        2z3ort
        2z3osz
        zo2t3a
        2z1ou
        zo2w
        2z1ox
        zo2ze
        2z1ö2d
        2z1ö2f
        3zög
        2z1ök
        z1öl
        2zöl.
        2zöle
        z2öli
        z2öll
        2zöls
        2z1p2
        z3pn
        2zq
        2z1r2
        z3ra
        z3ru
        2z1s2
        z3sa
        zsau2
        zsch2
        zse3r4u
        z3sh
        zsi1
        z3sk
        z3sl
        z3sp
        zst2
        zsu1
        zsui2
        2zt
        zt3abr
        zta2n
        z4t3an3e
        z4t5anze
        z2t3ar
        ztee2
        zte3eh
        zt3ehe
        zt5eins
        z4t3ent
        z4t3erz
        z3t4es
        zte3s4k
        zte5str
        zt3hel
        z2t3hi
        z2t3ho
        z2thu
        zt3ind
        zt3inf
        zt3ins
        zt4or
        zt4ram
        zt3rec
        zt3s2
        z4t3urs
        ztz2
        zu1
        zub2
        zucht5o
        zucht5r
        zuchts4
        zud2
        zudi4e
        2zueb
        zu3ebb
        zu3ebn
        zue2k
        zu2el
        zu2en
        zu3ent
        zu4erc
        zu4ern
        zue4r3o4
        zu4ers.
        zue2t
        zu3f2
        zu4g5ans
        zu4g3ar
        zu4g3at
        zug5eis
        zu4g5ent
        zugg2
        zug5inn
        zu4gla
        zu4glä
        zu4glö
        zug2r
        zug5rau
        zug4san
        2z3uhr
        zui2
        zu3le
        2z3ult
        zu3lu
        2z3um.
        2z3umb
        zumen4s
        2zumf
        2zumg
        2z3umh
        2zumk
        2zuml
        zu3mo
        2zumr
        2z3ums
        2z3um4t
        zu3m2u
        2z3umw
        4z3unab
        zun4am
        zu3n2e
        4z3unem
        4z3unfa
        4zunfä
        zunge4n5
        4zunget
        4z3ungl
        zungs3
        4z3u4nio
        2zunr
        2z3uns
        2zunt
        2zunw
        zuo2
        zup4fi
        zu3r4a
        2z3urk
        2z3url
        2z3urn
        2z3urs
        2z3urt
        zu3s2
        zu5sch4
        zus4e
        zus4p
        zu3t4a
        zu3te
        zut4r
        zuve4
        zuz2
        2züb
        zür3c
        2zv
        4zwaer
        4zwaes
        2zwaf
        2zwag
        2zwah
        2zwal
        4zwand
        z4wang
        2z3wap
        2zwa2s
        zwasse4
        2zwäc
        2zwär
        2zwäs
        2zweb
        z2wec
        4z3wech
        2zwed
        2zweg
        zweg3s
        2zweh
        5z4weig
        4zweil
        4zwein
        zwei5sc
        zwei6t5er6k
        2zwel
        2zwen
        z4werg
        4zwerk
        4zwert
        2zwes
        z2wic
        2zwid
        zwi2e
        4z5wied
        4zwild
        5z4wing
        4z5wint
        4zwirr
        4zwirt
        z4wisc
        4zwiss
        z4wist
        2zwur
        zwur4m3
        2zwü
        zy3an.
        5zyklu
        zy2le
        zy2m3i
        2zz
        zz2a
        zza3t
        z2z3id
        z2z3i2k
        zzi2n
        zz3ini
        zzi3s2
        zz2o
        zzol2
        z2z3or
        zz2ö
        zzug4s
        zz2w
        }
    </patterns>
</hyphenation-info>
